trunk/apertium-es-pt/apertium-es-pt.es.dix
    <pardef n="abat/ir__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iríamos</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iría</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iríais</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irías</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irían</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iría</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iremos</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iré</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iréis</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irás</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irán</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irá</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iéremos</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iere</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iereis</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieres</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieren</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iere</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iendo</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iéndo</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imos</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isteis</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iste</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieron</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ió</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amos</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ámo</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ámos</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantad"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__oí"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íd</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantád"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ír</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantár"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íamos</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ía</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íais</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ías</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ían</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ía</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iéramos</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>iésemos</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iera</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>iese</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierais</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ieseis</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieras</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ieses</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieran</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>iesen</l>

      <e lm="admitir">
        <i>admit</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="aplaudir">
        <i>aplaud</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="asumir">
        <i>asum</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="batir">
        <i>bat</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="combatir">
        <i>combat</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="concurrir" r="LR">
        <i>concurr</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="consistir">
        <i>consist</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="convivir">
        <i>conviv</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="debatir">
        <i>debat</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="definir">
        <i>defin</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="desistir">
        <i>desist</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="dimitir">
        <i>dimit</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="dividir">
        <i>divid</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="exhibir">
        <i>exhib</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="hundir">
        <i>hund</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="insistir">
        <i>insist</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="invadir">
        <i>invad</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="ocurrir">
        <i>ocurr</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="percibir">
        <i>percib</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="persistir">
        <i>persist</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="punir">
        <i>pun</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="recurrir">
        <i>recurr</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="reprimir">
        <i>reprim</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="resistir">
        <i>resist</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="sacudir">
        <i>sacud</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="subir">
        <i>sub</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="sufrir">
        <i>sufr</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="transcurrir">
        <i>transcurr</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="trasmitir" r="LR">
        <i>trasmit</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="vivir">
        <i>viv</i>
        <par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
      </e>
		<e lm="incumplir">
			<i>incumpl</i>
			<par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
		</e>
		<e lm="eludir">
			<i>elud</i>
			<par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
		</e>
<e lm="refundir">
	<p>
		<l>refund</l>
		<r>refund</r>
	</p>
	<par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="nutrir">
	<i>nutr</i>
	<par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="fundir">
	<i>fund</i>
	<par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="inquirir">
	<i>inquir</i>
	<par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="sumir">
	<i>sum</i>
	<par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="esgrimir">
	<i>esgrim</i>
	<par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="persuadir">
	<i>persuad</i>
	<par n="abat/ir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="rescindir" a="prompsit2cdl"><i>rescind</i><par n="abat/ir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="subsistir"><i>subsist</i><par n="abat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="redefinir" a="webform"><i>redefin</i><par n="abat/ir__vblex"/></e>
	  <e lm="desinhibir" a="eleka"><i>desinhib</i><par n="abat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="imprimir" a="prompsit"><i>imprim</i><par n="abat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="redefinir" a="prompsit"><i>redefin</i><par n="abat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="comprimir" a="prompsit"><i>comprim</i><par n="abat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="incidir" a="prompsit"><i>incid</i><par n="abat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="coexistir" a="prompsit"><i>coexist</i><par n="abat/ir__vblex"/></e>
